Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-604
Real property; acquisition by lease; election unnecessary.

It shall not be necessary, in order to acquire the necessary land for an aviation field by lease, to submit the proposition of such acquisition by lease to the legal voters of such county.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 4, p. 649.